Massachusetts, session 194th, S2093.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of Chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting the following clause:
Twenty-Third, the assessor shall accept any award letter provided to the Veteran from the
Veterans’ Administration the exemptions available pursuant to clauses Twenty-second, Twenty-
second A, Twenty-second B, Twenty-second C, Twenty-second D, Twenty-second E and
Twenty-second F. Assessors shall accept a disability affidavit, in lieu of a Veterans Affairs
Disability Award Letter, provided the affidavit is signed by the Veterans’ Service Office of their
respective municipality, on a form prescribed by the Division of Local Services. Nothing in this
clause shall be construed to authorize the assessor from requiring more information in
subsequent years once eligibility for the exemption is established.
of 1